Utah statutes.
16-10a-723.   Shares held by nominees.
(1)  A corporation may establish a procedure by which the beneficial owner of
shares that are registered in the name of a nominee is recognized by the
corporation as the shareholder.  The extent of this recognition may be
determined in the procedure.
(2)  The procedure described in Subsection (1) may set forth:
(a)  the types of nominees to which it applies;
(b)  the rights or privileges that the corporation recognizes in a beneficial
owner, which may include rights or privileges other than voting;
(c)  the manner in which the procedure may be used by the nominee;
(d)  the information that must be provided by the nominee when the procedure
is used;
(e)  the period for which the nominee's use of the procedure is effective; and
(f)  other aspects of the rights and duties created.
